docker/build/vendor/latexprinter/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-hsb.pat.txt
8ě
8ń5
ń6č3
ń7č4a
ń7č4e
ń7č4i
ń7č4u
ń7č4o
8ó
3š2ć
8ź
1k8ř8
1p8ř8
1t8ř8
a3b2a
a3b2e
a3b2ě
a3b2i
a3b2o
a3b2u
a3b2y
a3b2j
a3b2r
a3b2l
a3b2ł
a3c2a
a3c2e
a3c2o
a3c2u
a3c2y
a3c2i
a3ch2a
a3ch2e
a3ch2o
a3ch2u
a3ch2y
a3ch2i
a3ć2a
a3ć2e
a3ć2i
a3ć2o
a3ć2u
a3č2a
a3č2e
a3č2ě
a3č2i
a3č2o
a3č2u
a3d2a
a3d2e
a3d2i
a3d2o
a3d2u
a3d2y
a3d2ź2a
a3d2ź2e
a3d2ź2ě
a3d2ź2i
a3d2ź2o
a3d2ź2u
a3d2ź2y
a3dl2
a3dr2
a3f2a
a3f2e
a3f2y
a3f2o
a3f2u
a3f2i
a3f2l
a3f2r2
a1g2r2
a1g2l2
a1g2a
a1g2e
a1g2ě
a1g2o
a1g2u
a1g2i
a1h2a
a1h2e
a1h2ě
a1h2o
a1h2u
a1h2i
aj1
a1j2a
a1j2e
a1j2ě
a1j2i
a1j2o
a1j2u
a1k2a
a1k2e
a1k2i
a1k2u
a1k2o
a1k2r
a1k2l
a3ł2a
a3ł2e
a3ł2o
a3ł2u
a3ł2y
ał1
a3l2a
a3l2e
a3l2ě
a3l2o
a3l2u
a3l2i
a3l2y
a3m2a
a3m2o
a3m2u
a3m2i
a3m2e
a3m2ě
a3m2y
a3m2j
a3n2a
a3n2e
a3n2ě
a3n2i
a3n2o
a3n2u
a3n2y
a3n2j
a3p2a
a3p2e
a3p2ě
a3p2i
a3p2o
a3p2u
a3p2y
a3p2j
a3p2l
a3p2r
a3r2a
a3r2e
a3r2ě
a3r2i
a3r2o
a3r2u
a3r2y
a3r2j
a3s2a
a3s2e
a3s2i
a3s2o
a3s2u
a3s2y
as1pek1t
a3s2t
a3š2a
a3š2e
a3š2ě
a3š2i
a3š2o
a3š2u
a3š2y
a3š2tap
aš1
a3t2a
a3t2e
a3t2i
a3t2o
a3t2u
a3t2y
a3t2r
a3t2l
a3w2a
a3w2e
a3w2ě
a3w2i
a2w1n
a3w2o
a3w2u
a3w2y
a3w2j
a3z2a
a3z2e
a3z2ě
a3z2i
a3z2o
a3z2u
a3z2y
a3ž2a
a3ž2e
a3ž2ě
a3ž2i
a3ž2o
a3ž2u
a2ž1
e3b2a
e3b2e
e3b2i
e3b2o
e3b2u
e3b2y
e3b2j
e3b2r
e3b2ł
e3b2l
e3c2a
e3c2e
e3c2o
e3c2u
e3c2y
e3c2i
e3ch2a
e3ch2e
e3ch2o
e3ch2u
e3ch2i
e3ć2a
e3ć2e
e3ć2i
e3ć2o
e3ć2u
e3č2a
e3č2e
e3č2i
e3č2o
e3č2u
e3d2a
e3d2e
e3d2i
e3d2o
e3d2u
e3d2y
e3d2ź2a
e3d2ź2e
e3d2ź2i
e3d2ź2o
e3d2ź2u
e3d2ź2y
e3dl2
e3dr2
e3f2a
e3f2e
e3f2y
e3f2o
e3f2u
e3f2i
e3f2l
e3f2r2
e1g2r2
e1g2l2
e1g2a
e1g2e
e1g2o
e1g2u
e1g2i
e1h2a
e1h2o
e1h2u
e1h2i
ej1
e1j2a
e1j2e
e1j2i
e1j2o
e1j2u
e1k2a
e1k2e
e1k2i
e1k2u
e1k2o
e1k2r
e1k2l
e1ł2a
e1ł2e
e1ł2o
e1ł2u
e1ł2y
eł1
e1l2a
e1l2e
e1l2o
e1l2u
e1l2i
e3m2a
e3m2o
e3m2u
e3m2i
e3m2e
e3m2y
e3m2j
e3n2a
e3n2e
e3n2i
e3n2o
e3n2u
e3n2y
e3n2j
e3p2a
e3p2e
e3p2i
e3p2o
e3p2u
e3p2y
e3p2j
e3p2l
e3p2r
e3r2a
e3r2e
e3r2i
e3r2o
e3r2u
e3r2y
e3r2j
er2b1s2k
e3s2a
e3s2e
e3s2i
e3s2o
e3s2u
e3s2y
e3s2t
e3š2a
e3š2e
e3š2i
e3š2o
e3š2u
e3š2y
e3š2tap
eš1
e3t2a
e3t2e
e3t2i
e3t2o
e3t2u
e3t2y
e3t2r
e3t2l
e3w2a
e3w2e
e3w2i
e3w2o
e3w2u
e3w2y
e3w2j
e3z2a
e3z2e
e3z2i
e3z2o
e3z2u
e3z2y
e3ž2a
e3ž2e
e3ž2i
e3ž2o
e3ž2u
e2ž1
ě3b2a
ě3b2e
ě3b2i
ě3b2o
ě3b2u
ě3b2y
ě3b2j
ě3b2r
ě3b2l
ě3c2a
ě3c2e
ě3c2o
ě3c2u
ě3c2y
ě3ch2a
ě3ch2e
ě3ch2o
ě3ch2u
ě3ch2i
ě3ć2a
ě3ć2e
ě3ć2i
ě3ć2o
ě3ć2u
ě3č2a
ě3č2e
ě3č2i
ě3č2o
ě3č2u
ě3d2a
ě3d2e
ě3d2i
ě3d2o
ě3d2u
ě3d2y
ě3d2ź2a
ě3d2ź2e
ě3d2ź2i
ě3d2ź2o
ě3d2ź2u
ě3d2ź2y
ě3dl2
ě3dr2
ě3f2a
ě3f2e
ě3f2y
ě3f2o
ě3f2u
ě3f2i
ě3f2l
ě3f2r2
ě1g2r2
ě1g2l2
ě1g2a
ě1g2e
ě1g2o
ě1g2u
ě1g2i
ě1h2a
ě1h2o
ě1h2u
ě1h2i
ěj1
ě1j2a
ě1j2e
ě1j2i
ě1j2o
ě1j2u
ě1k2a
ě1k2e
ě1k2i
ě1k2u
ě1k2o
ě1k2r
ě1k2l
ě1ł2a
ě1ł2e
ě1ł2o
ě1ł2u
ě1ł2y
ě1l2a
ě1l2e
ě1l2o
ě1l2u
ě1l2i
ě3m2a
ě3m2o
ě3m2u
ě3m2i
ě3m2e
ě3m2y
ě3m2j
ě3n2a
ě3n2e
ě3n2i
ě3n2o
ě3n2u
ě3n2y
ě3n2j
ě3p2a
ě3p2e
ě3p2i
ě3p2o
ě3p2u
ě3p2y
ě3p2j
ě3p2l
ě3p2r
ě3r2a
ě3r2e
ě3r2i
ě3r2o
ě3r2u
ě3r2y
ě3r2j
ě3s2a
ě3s2e
ě3s2i
ě3s2o
ě3s2u
ě3s2y
ě3s2t
ě3š2a
ě3š2e
ě3š2i
ě3š2o
ě3š2u
ě3š2y
ě3š2tap
ěš1
ě3t2a
ě3t2e
ě3t2i
ě3t2o
ě3t2u
ě3t2y
ě3t2r
ě3t2l
ě3w2a
ě3w2e
ě3w2i
ě3w2o
ě3w2u
ě3w2y
ě3w2j
ě3z2a
ě3z2e
ě3z2i
ě3z2o
ě3z2u
ě3z2y
ě3ž2a
ě3ž2e
ě3ž2i
ě3ž2o
ě3ž2u
ě2ž1
i3b2a
i3b2e
i3b2i
i3b2o
i3b2u
i3b2y
i3b2j
i3b2r
i3b2l
i3c2a
i3c2e
i3c2o
i3c2u
i3c2y
i3c2i
i3ch2a
i3ch2e
i3ch2o
i3ch2u
i3ch2i
i3ć2a
i3ć2e
i3ć2i
i3ć2o
i3ć2u
i3č2a
i3č2e
i3č2i
i3č2o
i3č2u
i3d2a
i3d2e
i3d2i
i3d2o
i3d2u
i3d2y
i3d2ź2a
i3d2ź2e
i3d2ź2i
i3d2ź2o
i3d2ź2u
i3d2ź2y
i3dl2
i3dr2
i3f2a
i3f2e
i3f2y
i3f2o
i3f2u
i3f2i
i3f2l
i3f2r2
i1g2r2
i1g2l2
i1g2a
i1g2e
i1g2o
i1g2u
i1g2i
i1h2a
i1h2o
i1h2u
i1h2i
ij1
i1j2a
i1j2e
i1j2i
i1j2o
i1j2u
i1k2a
i1k2e
i1k2i
i1k2u
i1k2o
i1k2r
i1k2l
i1ł2a
i1ł2e
i1ł2o
i1ł2u
i1ł2y
ił1
i1l2a
i1l2e
i1l2o
i1l2u
i1l2i
i3m2a
i3m2o
i3m2u
i3m2i
i3m2e
i3m2y
i3m2j
i3n2a
i3n2e
i3n2i
i3n2o
i3n2u
i3n2y
i3n2j
i3p2a
i3p2e
i3p2i
i3p2o
i3p2u
i3p2y
i3p2j
i3p2l
i3p2r
i3r2a
i3r2e
i3r2i
i3r2o
i3r2u
i3r2y
i3r2j
i3s2a
i3s2e
i3s2i
i3s2o
i3s2u
i3s2y
i3s2t
i3š2a
i3š2e
i3š2i
i3š2o
i3š2u
i3š2y
i3š2tap
iš1
i3t2a
i3t2e
i3t2i
i3t2o
i3t2u
i3t2y
i3t2r
i3t2l
i3w2a
i3w2e
i3w2i
i3w2o
i2w1n
i3w2u
i3w2y
i3w2j
i3z2a
i3z2e
i3z2i
i3z2o
i3z2u
i3z2y
i3ž2a
i3ž2e
i3ž2i
i3ž2o
i3ž2u
i2ž1
o3b2a
o3b2e
o3b2i
o3b2o
o3b2u
o3b2y
o3b2j
o3b2r
o3b2l
o3c2a
o3c2e
o3c2o
o3c2u
o3c2y
o3ch2a
o3ch2e
o3ch2o
o3ch2u
o3ch2i
o3ć2a
o3ć2e
o3ć2i
o3ć2o
o3ć2u
o3č2a
o3č2e
o3č2i
o3č2o
o3č2u
o3d2a
o3d2e
o3d2i
o3d2o
o3d2u
o3d2y
o3d2ź2a
o3d2ź2e
o3d2ź2i
o3d2ź2o
o3d2ź2u
o3d2ź2y
o3dl2
o3dr2
o3f2a
o3f2e
o3f2y
o3f2o
o3f2u
o3f2i
o3f2l
o3f2r2
o1g2r2
o1g2l2
o1g2a
o1g2e
o1g2o
o1g2u
o1g2i
o1h2a
o1h2o
o1h2u
o1h2i
oj1
o1j2a
o1j2e
o1j2i
o1j2o
o1j2u
o1k2a
o1k2e
o1k2i
o1k2u
o1k2o
o1k2r
o1k2l
o1k2ł
o1ł2a
o1ł2e
o1ł2o
o1ł2u
o1ł2y
oł1
o1l2a
o1l2e
o1l2o
o1l2u
o1l2i
o3m2a
o3m2o
o3m2u
o3m2i
o3m2e
o3m2ě
o3m2y
o3m2j
o3n2a
o3n2e
o3n2i
o3n2o
o3n2u
o3n2y
o3n2j
o3p2a
o3p2e
o3p2i
o3p2o
o3p2u
o3p2y
o3p2j
o3p2l
o3p2r
o3r2a
o3r2e
o3r2i
o3r2o
o3r2u
o3r2y
o3r2j
o3s2a
o3s2e
o3s2i
o3s2o
o3s2u
o3s2y
o3sled1
o3s2t
o3š2a
o3š2e
o3š2i
o3š2o
o3š2u
o3š2y
o3š2tap
oš1
o3t2a
o3t2e
o3t2i
o3t2o
o3t2u
o3t2y
o3t2r
o3t2l
o3w2a
o3w2e
o3w2ě
o3w2i
o2w1n
o3w2o
o3w2u
o3w2y
o3w2j
o3z2a
o3z2e
o3z2i
o3z2o
o3z2u
o3z2y
o3ž2a
o3ž2e
o3ž2i
o3ž2o
o3ž2u
o2ž1
ó3b2a
ó3b2e
ó3b2i
ó3b2o
ó3b2u
ó3b2y
ó3b2j
ó3b2r
ó3b2l
ó3c2a
ó3c2e
ó3c2o
ó3c2u
ó3c2y
ó3ch2a
ó3ch2e
ó3ch2o
ó3ch2u
ó3ch2i
ó3ć2a
ó3ć2e
ó3ć2i
ó3ć2o
ó3ć2u
ó3č2a
ó3č2e
ó3č2i
ó3č2o
ó3č2u
ó3d2a
ó3d2e
ó3d2i
ó3d2o
ó3d2u
ó3d2y
ó3d2ź2a
ó3d2ź2e
ó3d2ź2i
ó3d2ź2o
ó3d2ź2u
ó3d2ź2y
ó3dl2
ó3dr2
ó3f2a
ó3f2e
ó3f2y
ó3f2o
ó3f2u
ó3f2i
ó3f2l
ó3f2r2
ó1g2r2
ó1g2l2
ó1g2a
ó1g2e
ó1g2o
ó1g2u
ó1g2i
ó1h2a
ó1h2o
ó1h2u
ó1h2i
ój1
ó1j2a
ó1j2e
ó1j2i
ó1j2o
ó1j2u
ó1k2a
ó1k2e
ó1k2i
ó1k2u
ó1k2o
ó1k2r
ó1k2l
ó1ł2a
ó1ł2e
ó1ł2o
ó1ł2u
ó1ł2y
ół1
ó1l2a
ó1l2e
ó1l2o
ó1l2u
ó1l2i
ó3m2a
ó3m2o
ó3m2u
ó3m2i
ó3m2e
ó3m2y
ó3m2j
ó3n2a
ó3n2e
ó3n2i
ó3n2o
ó3n2u
ó3n2y
ó3n2j
ó3p2a
ó3p2e
ó3p2i
ó3p2o
ó3p2u
ó3p2y
ó3p2j
ó3p2l
ó3p2r
ó3r2a
ó3r2e
ó3r2i
ó3r2o
ó3r2u
ó3r2y
ó3r2j
ó3s2a
ó3s2e
ó3s2i
ó3s2o
ó3s2u
ó3s2y
ó3s2t
ó3š2a
ó3š2e
ó3š2i
ó3š2o
ó3š2u
ó3š2y
ó3š2tap
óš1
ó3t2a
ó3t2e
ó3t2i
ó3t2o
ó3t2u
ó3t2y
ó3t2r
ó3t2l
ó3w2a
ó3w2e
ó3w2i
ó3w2o
ó3w2u
ó3w2y
ó3w2j
ó3z2a
ó3z2e
ó3z2i
ó3z2o
ó3z2u
ó3z2y
ó3ž2a
ó3ž2e
ó3ž2i
ó3ž2o
ó3ž2u
ó2ž1
u3b2a
u3b2e
u3b2i
u3b2o
u3b2u
u3b2y
u3b2j
u3b2r
u3b2l
u3c2a
u3c2e
u3c2o
u3c2u
u3c2y
u3c2i
u3ch2a
u3ch2e
u3ch2o
u3ch2u
u3ch2i
u3ć2a
u3ć2e
u3ć2i
u3ć2o
u3ć2u
u3č2a
u3č2e
u3č2i
u3č2o
u3č2u
u3d2a
u3d2e
u3d2i
u3d2o
u3d2u
u3d2y
u3d2ź2a
u3d2ź2e
u3d2ź2i
u3d2ź2o
u3d2ź2u
u3d2ź2y
u3dl2
u3dr2
u3f2a
u3f2e
u3f2y
u3f2o
u3f2u
u3f2i
u3f2l
u3f2r2
u1g2r2
u1g2l2
u1g2a
u1g2e
u1g2o
u1g2u
u1g2i
u1h2a
u1h2o
u1h2u
u1h2i
uj1
u1j2a
u1j2e
u1j2i
u1j2o
u1j2u
u1k2a
u1k2e
u1k2i
u1k2u
u1k2o
u1k2r
u1k2l
u1ł2a
u1ł2e
u1ł2o
u1ł2u
u1ł2y
uł1
u1l2a
u1l2e
u1l2o
u1l2u
u1l2i
u3m2a
u3m2o
u3m2u
u3m2i
u3m2e
u3m2y
u3m2j
u3n2a
u3n2e
u3n2i
u3n2o
u3n2u
u3n2y
u3n2j
u3p2a
u3p2e
u3p2i
u3p2o
u3p2u
u3p2y
u3p2j
u3p2l
u3p2r
u3r2a
u3r2e
u3r2i
u3r2o
u3r2u
u3r2y
u3r2j
u3s2a
u3s2e
u3s2i
u3s2o
u3s2u
u3s2y
u3s2t
u3š2a
u3š2e
u3š2i
u3š2o
u3š2u
u3š2y
u3š2tap
uš1
u3t2a
u3t2e
u3t2i
u3t2o
u3t2u
u3t2y
u3t2r
u3t2l
u3w2a
u3w2e
u3w2i
u2w1n
u3w2o
u3w2u
u3w2y
u3w2j
u3z2a
u3z2e
u3z2i
u3z2o
u3z2u
u3z2y
u3ž2a
u3ž2e
u3ž2i
u3ž2o
u3ž2u
u2ž1
y3b2a
y3b2e
y3b2i
y3b2o
y3b2u
y3b2y
y3b2j
y3b2r
y3b2l
y3c2a
y3c2e
y3c2o
y3c2u
y3c2y
y3ć2a
y3ć2e
y3ć2i
y3ć2o
y3ć2u
y3č2a
y3č2e
y3č2i
y3č2o
y3č2u
y3d2a
y3d2e
y3d2i
y3d2o
y3d2u
y3d2y
y3d2ź2a
y3d2ź2e
y3d2ź2i
y3d2ź2o
y3d2ź2u
y3d2ź2y
y3dl2
y3dr2
y3f2a
y3f2e
y3f2y
y3f2o
y3f2u
y3f2i
y3f2l
y3f2r2
y1g2r2
y1g2l2
y1g2a
y1g2e
y1g2o
y1g2u
y1g2i
y1h2a
y1h2o
y1h2u
y1h2i
yj1
y1j2a
y1j2e
y1j2i
y1j2o
y1j2u
y1k2a
y1k2e
y1k2i
y1k2u
y1k2o
y1k2r
y1k2l
y1ł2a
y1ł2e
y1ł2o
y1ł2u
y1ł2y
ył1
y1l2a
y1l2e
y1l2o
y1l2u
y1l2i
y3m2a
y3m2o
y3m2u
y3m2i
y3m2e
y3m2y
y3m2j
y3n2a
y3n2e
y3n2i
y3n2o
y3n2u
y3n2y
y3n2j
y3p2a
y3p2e
y3p2i
y3p2o
y3p2u
y3p2y
y3p2j
y3p2l
y3p2r
y3r2a
y3r2e
y3r2i
y3r2o
y3r2u
y3r2y
y3r2j
y3s2a
y3s2e
y3s2i
y3s2o
y3s2u
y3s2y
y3s2t
y3š2a
y3š2e
y3š2i
y3š2o
y3š2u
y3š2y
y3š2tap
yš1
y3t2a
y3t2e
y3t2i
y3t2o
y3t2u
y3t2y
y3t2r
y3t2l
y3w2a
y3w2e
y3w2i
y3w2o
y3w2u
y3w2y
y3w2j
y3z2a
y3z2e
y3z2i
y3z2o
y3z2u
y3z2y
y3ž2a
y3ž2e
y3ž2i
y3ž2o
y3ž2u
y2ž1
.a8b7itu1r
.a8b7itu8r1n
b1b
b1ce
b1cy
b1ć
b1č
b1d
.bjez1
.bje1z2e
b2j
b1h
b1k
b1m
b1n
b1p
b1s
b1t
b1w
b1z
b1ž
1ca
1ce
1co
1cu
c2h
.ch2c
ch1ć
ch1n
č1n
d1bpo4d3
4deń
d1n
oł1d2nj
do1s1po
do1z2na
do2z3na.
nje1do3z4na.
im1ple
1h2d
1h2lad
2h1ny
2h1nu.
2h1nje
1h2romad
.nje1z2hromad
1ka
k1c
1ku
1ki
k1n
k2nys1k
1ko
ko8n7ju3g
ko8n7jun8k1
ko8n7urb
k1s
k1t
k2tu.
kuz1ł
kuz1l
2k2st.
3ł2ha
.bo4ł3h
.do4ł3h
.do4ł3ho3
.po4ł3h
l1n
3ł2ž
.do4łž1n
.po4ł3ž
l1g
l1z
m1n
3m2ru.
3m2rje
3m2rě
m1s
mys1l
na1
.na4d1
.nje1na4d1
.na4d2eń
.nje1na4d2eń
.na4d2eš
.nje1na4d2eš
2n1d
1ni.
n4j
1nja.
1nje.
.nje1
n1t
n2t1n
nuh1l
p4j
po1
po4d3
po4d4e1
po2m1h
po2mń
praw1
pře1
pře4d3
pře5d4a
pře5d4o
pře5d4i
pře5d4u
pře5d4rast
pře5d4rasć
pře4d4e3
r1b
ser2b1
ser3b2a
ser3b2e
ser3b2o
ser3b2i
ser3b2y
r1ć
r1č
r1d
r1f
r2dź.
r4j
r1m
r1n
r1p
r1w
ro2z1
ro2z2e1
s1ć
si1gna1l
m2la2s3ka
z1mor3s3ka
pra2s3ka
plu2s3ka
ći2s3ka
wrje2s3ka
1s2k2i.
1s2k2a.
1s2k2e.
1s2k2eho.
1s2k2eje.
1s2k2ej.
1s2k2aj.
1s2k2emu.
1s2k2u.
1s2k2im.
1s2k2imaj.
1s2k2eju.
1s2k2imi.
1s2k2i2ch.
1s2c2y.
1s2c2e.
s1n
s2tat1n
4st1n
2n1stw
1š2to.
1š2li.
1š2łe.
1š2ła.
1š2łoj.
1š2oł.
1š2łaj.
1š2łej.
š1
1š8a
1š8e
1š8ě
1š8i
1š8o
1š8u
a2š1nj
t1d
t1k
ě2t3n
t1m
t1n
t1p
w4j
.wje1le3
w4n1st
.wo4b2e
wo4b3jas1n
wo4b3jeć
wo4b3jed1n
wo4b3jě
wo4b3jim
.nje1wo4b2e1
.wo4te3
.njewo4te3
wo1zna
.wu1
wu1s2nu
wu1s2n2j2e
wu1s2ny
.za1
.za2ń
.za2w1k
.za2w3da
ze1z2na
z1nak
iz1na.
iz1ny.
iz1nu.
iz1nje.
iz1no
2z1p
2z1s
